Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.185

Online system for complaints—Procedure.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1296-S.SL) ***

(1)(a) By November 1, 2023, the commission shall establish and maintain on its website an online system for students who attend charter schools, and the parents of those students, to submit complaints about the operation and administration of one or more charter schools, including complaints about the provision of education services and complaints alleging noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter or other provisions governing charter schools.

(b) The commission shall acknowledge the receipt of each received complaint within 10 business days and shall, in a timely manner, perform any inquiries or other actions it deems necessary and appropriate to respond to each received complaint.

(2) The commission shall adopt and revise as necessary rules to implement this section.

[ 2023 c 356 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 356: See note following RCW 28A.710.030.